Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 26 Practice of Midwifery

Administrative rules and regulations.

Midwifery, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules for certified nurse-midwives, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Board of Nursing, Regulation of Advanced Practice Registered Nurses, Chapter 410-11.

Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Chapter 511-5.

31-26-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Midwife” means any person not licensed under the laws of this state to practice obstetrics who is regularly engaged in attending women in childbirth or who holds himself or herself out as such, whether or not for consideration.

“Normal childbirth” means delivery, at or close to term, of a pregnant woman whose physical examination by a physician reveals no abnormalities and who does not have signs or symptoms of hemorrhage, toxemia, infection, abnormal position or presentation, or prolonged labor.

“Practice of midwifery” means and includes any act or practice of attending women in childbirth when engaged in by a midwife, whether or not for consideration.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1401, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-26-2.
Requirement of certificate; application; educational requirements; issuance, suspension, and revocation.

No person shall practice midwifery without first receiving from the Department of Public Health a certificate of authority as provided in this Code section and registering his or her name, address, and occupation with the county board of health and the local registrar, as defined in Code Section 31-10-2, of vital statistics in the county and district in which he or she lives.

Persons desiring to enter into or continue the practice of midwifery shall make written application to the department through the county board of health in the county of their residence. All applicants for permits to practice midwifery shall be of good character and sound mind, shall be free of tuberculosis, sexually transmitted diseases, and other communicable diseases in the infectious stage, and shall be protected against smallpox.

In order to become eligible for a certificate of authority to practice midwifery, applicants shall attend classes and satisfactorily complete courses of instruction therein to be prescribed by the department and shall pass an examination covering such courses. Such applicants shall also pass such physical examinations or, in the alternative, provide such evidence with regard to their personal health as the department may require.

The department or any county board of health designated by the department shall issue, or refuse to issue, or, having issued, may suspend or revoke certificates of authority to practice midwifery under and in accordance with this chapter and such rules and regulations as may be issued and promulgated under this chapter. Certificates issued under this chapter shall be renewable annually at such time and in such manner as prescribed by the department. Suspension and revocation of certificates shall be subject to the administrative procedures contained in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, §§ 2-5; Code 1933, §§ 88-1402, 88-1403, 88-1404, 88-1405, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” in the second sentence of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-26-3.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall have the authority and power to adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may appear necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, minimum educational and physical requirements for midwives and procedures and techniques to be employed and ethics to be observed in the practice of midwifery. The several county boards of health shall have the authority and power to adopt and promulgate supplementary rules and regulations consistent with those adopted and promulgated by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-1406, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-26-4.
Conduct prohibited of certificate holders.

A certificate issued under this chapter shall not confer upon any person the right to practice medicine; to prescribe or administer drugs; to undertake charge of abnormal cases of confinement or of any disease in connection with confinement; or to assume any name, title, or designation implying that such person is authorized by law to undertake charge of any such cases, or to practice medicine, or to administer drugs.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-1407, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-26-5.
Attendance at other than normal childbirth; prohibited procedures; conduct in event of complications.

It shall be unlawful for any person holding a certificate as a midwife to attend any cases other than those of normal childbirth or to perform any internal examinations or manipulations of any kind. In all cases in which the child is not delivered spontaneously within a reasonable time, the midwife shall notify a qualified physician immediately and shall make no effort to deliver the child except under direction and supervision of such physician.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, § 9; Code 1933, § 88-1408, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-26-6.
Enforcement.

The department and county boards of health and their duly authorized agents are authorized and empowered to enforce compliance with this chapter and rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this chapter, as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, § 10; Code 1933, § 88-1409, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-26-7.
Injunctive relief of violations.

Any violation of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under this chapter is declared to be a public nuisance subject to abatement as provided in Code Section 31-5-9.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 252, § 11; Code 1933, § 88-1410, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.